test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-maigaaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - maigāz: # adjectives 169 'eng /est maias/fin' - full paradigm
     maigāz+A+Sg+Nom: maigāz
     maigāz+A+Sg+Gen: [maʼigõ, maigõ]
     maigāz+A+Sg+Par: maigāzt
     maigāz+A+Sg+Dat: maigān
     maigāz+A+Sg+Ins: maigāks
     maigāz+A+Sg+Ill: [maʼigõ, maʼigõz, maigõ, maigõz]
     maigāz+A+Sg+Ela: maigāst
     maigāz+A+Pl+Nom: maigād
     maigāz+A+Pl+Gen: maigād
     maigāz+A+Pl+Par: maigīdi
     maigāz+A+Pl+Dat: maigādõn
     maigāz+A+Pl+Ins: maigādõks
     maigāz+A+Pl+Ill: maigīž
     maigāz+A+Pl+Ela: maigīst
